test/src/gt-desc-yamls/Nov_2016_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfstol: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfstol: Morph
  xerox:
      ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst: Gen
      ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst: Morph
      lookup: App

Tests:

# words where several phonological rules interact

  Nouns:
    idu+N+Sg+Nom: idu
    idu+N+Sg+Gen: [eo, idu]
    ligu+N+Sg+Nom: ligu
    ligu+N+Sg+Gen: leo
    ligu+N+Sg+Ill: likku
    riie+N+Sg+Nom: riie
    riie+N+Sg+Gen: riide
    saag+N+Sg+Nom: saag
    saag+N+Sg+Gen: sae
    viga+N+Sg+Nom: viga
    viga+N+Sg+Gen: vea
    viga+N+Pl+Par: vigu
    pood+N+Sg+Nom: pood
    pood+N+Sg+Gen: poe
    pood+N+Pl+Par: poode

    sai+N+Sg+Nom: sai
    sai+N+Sg+Gen: saia
    sai+N+Sg+Par: saia
    sai+N+Pl+Par: saiu

    foto+N+Sg+Nom: foto
    foto+N+Sg+Par: fotot
    foto+N+Sg+Ill: fotosse
    foto+N+Pl+Par: fotosid

    Saku+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Saku
    Saku+N+Prop+Sg+Par: Sakut
    Saku+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Sakku
    Saku+N+Prop+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: Sakusse
    Saku+N+Prop+Pl+Par: Sakusid

    Rõngu+N+Prop+Sg+Nom: Rõngu
    Rõngu+N+Prop+Sg+Par: Rõngut
    Rõngu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill: Rõngu
    Rõngu+N+Prop+Sg+Ill+Usage/Rare: Rõngusse
    Rõngu+N+Prop+Pl+Par: Rõngusid

    päev+N+Sg+Nom: päev
    päev+N+Sg+Gen: päeva
    päev+N+Sg+Par: päeva
    päev+N+Sg+Ill: päeva
    päev+N+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp: päevasse
    päev+N+Pl+Par: päevi
    päev+N+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: päevasid
    päev+N+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: päevil
    
    valdkond+N+Sg+Nom: valdkond
    valdkond+N+Sg+Gen: valdkonna
    valdkond+N+Sg+Par: valdkonda
    valdkond+N+Sg+Ill: valdkonda
    valdkond+N+Sg+Ill+Usage/Hyp: valdkonnasse
    valdkond+N+Pl+Par: valdkondi
    valdkond+N+Pl+Par+Usage/Rare: valdkondasid
    valdkond+N+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: valdkonnil

    rind+N+Pl+Ade+Usage/Rare: rinnul
    
